California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) The majority of its cost of performance is attributable to an addition to real property or an alteration of land or any improvement thereto as those terms are utilized for purposes of this code.

“Construction project” does not include the operation, rental, leasing, or depletion of real property, land, or any improvement thereto.

(2) “Location of which is not subject to the taxpayer’s control” means that the place at which the majority of the construction takes place results from the nature or character of the construction project and not as a result of the terms of the contract or agreement governing the construction project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24414.

(a) Section 195 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to startup expenditures, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) References to Sections 163(a), 164, 165, and 174 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to interest, taxes, losses, and research and experimental expenditures, are modified to refer to Sections 24344, 24345, 24347, and 24365, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 878, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24415.

(a) To the extent specified in subdivision (b), there shall be allowed as a deduction to a taxpayer those payments of the taxpayer which are made pursuant to an interindemnity arrangement specified in Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code and which are paid to a trust of members of a cooperative corporation organized and operated under Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code and the members of which consist solely of physicians and surgeons licensed in this state.

(b) The deduction authorized by subdivision (a) shall be taken with respect to the taxable year in which the payment is made and shall be taken only to the extent that the payment does not exceed the amount which would otherwise be payable to an independent insurance company for similar coverage for medical malpractice insurance in that taxable year. Any portion of the payment in excess of that amount shall be treated as a payment under the interindemnity arrangement for five succeeding taxable years and may be carried forward as a deduction to those five succeeding taxable years until used. The deduction shall be applied first to the earliest years possible.

(c) In the event any payment is refunded by the trust to the taxpayer for any reason, the payment shall be included in the taxpayer’s income for the taxable year in which it is received to the extent that the payment or any
 portion thereof was taken as a deduction in any earlier taxable year.

(d) Any refund of a payment which is made by a trust to a taxpayer shall be reported by the trust to the Franchise Tax Board in the year in which the refund is made. The trust shall furnish the taxpayer with a copy of that report. In the case of any payment to be made to a taxpayer who is not a resident of the State of California in the year in which the refund is made, the Franchise Tax Board may, by regulation, require the trust to withhold an amount from the refund, determined by the Franchise Tax Board to reasonably represent the amount of tax due when that refund is included with other income of the taxpayer, and to transmit the amount withheld to the Franchise Tax Board at a time as it may designate.

(e) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Payment” means a contribution to or an assessment by an interindemnity arrangement described in Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code.

(2) “Taxpayer” means a corporation whose shares are held by a physician and surgeon, or physicians and surgeons, licensed in this state which is a participating member in an interindemnity arrangement described in Section 1280.7 of the Insurance Code.

(3) “Trust” means a trust described in subdivision (a).

(f) Upon request, the trust shall submit to the Franchise Tax Board the names and membership dates of all participating corporations.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe those regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 158.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.

Except as provided in Sections 24416.1, 24416.4, and 24416.7, or Sections 24416.2, 24416.5, and 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, a net operating loss deduction shall be allowed in computing net income under Section 24341 and shall be determined in accordance with Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided.

(a) (1) Net operating losses attributable to taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987, shall not be allowed.

(2) A net operating loss shall not be carried forward to any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987.

(3) The amendments made by Section 13302(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) and Section 2303(a)(1) of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136) to Section 172(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the deduction allowed, shall not apply.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), the provisions of Section 172(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amount of carrybacks and carryovers, shall be modified so that the applicable percentage of the entire amount of the net operating loss for any taxable year shall be eligible for carryover to any subsequent taxable
 year. For purposes of this subdivision, the applicable percentage shall be:

(A) Fifty percent for any taxable year beginning before January 1, 2000.

(B) Fifty-five percent for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2002.

(C) Sixty percent for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004.

(D) One hundred percent for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2004.

(2) Section 172(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(3) In the case
 of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates a new business during that taxable year, each of the
 following shall apply to each loss incurred during the first three taxable years of operating the new business:

(A) If the net operating loss is equal to or less than the net loss from the new business, 100 percent of the net operating loss shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (e).

(B) If the net operating loss is greater than the net loss from the new business, the net operating loss shall be carried over as follows:

(i) With respect to an amount equal to the net loss from the new business, 100 percent of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (e).

(ii) With respect to the portion of the net operating loss
 that exceeds the net loss from the new business, the applicable percentage of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (d).

(C) For purposes of Section 172(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amount of carrybacks and carryovers, the amount described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall be absorbed before the amount described in clause (i) of subparagraph (B).

(4) In the case of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates an eligible small business during that taxable year, each of the following apply:

(A) If the net operating loss is equal to or less than the net loss from the eligible small business, 100
 percent of the net operating loss shall be carried forward to the taxable years specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e).

(B) If the net operating loss is greater than the net loss from the eligible small business, the net operating loss shall be carried over as follows:

(i) With respect to an amount equal to the net loss from the eligible small business, 100 percent of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (e).

(ii) With respect to that portion of the net operating loss that exceeds the net loss from the eligible small business, the applicable percentage of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (e).

(C) For purposes of Section 172(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amount of carrybacks and carryovers, the amount described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall be absorbed before the amount described in clause (i) of subparagraph (B).

(5) In the case of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates a business that qualifies as both a new business and an eligible small business under this section, that business shall be treated as a new business for the first three taxable years of the new business.

(6) In the case of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates more than one business, and more than one of those businesses
 qualifies as either a new business or an eligible small business under this section, paragraph (2) shall be applied first, except that if there is any remaining portion of the net operating loss after application of clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), paragraph (3) shall be applied to the remaining portion of the net operating loss as though that remaining portion of the net operating loss constituted the entire net operating loss.

(7) For purposes of this section, “net loss” means the amount of net loss after application of Sections 465 and 469 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) For any taxable year in which the taxpayer has in effect a water’s-edge election under Section 25110, the deduction of a net operating loss carryover shall be denied to the extent that the net operating
 loss carryover was determined by taking into account the income and factors of an affiliated corporation in a combined report whose income and apportionment factors would not have been taken into account if a water’s-edge election under Section 25110 had been in effect for the taxable year in which the loss was incurred.

(d) Section 172(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to years to which the loss may be carried, is modified as follows:

(1) Net operating loss carrybacks shall not be allowed for any net operating losses attributable to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018, and before January 1, 2013.

(2) A net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before
 January 1, 2019, shall be a net operating loss carryback to each of the two taxable years preceding the taxable year of the loss in lieu of the number of years provided therein.

(A) For a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before January 1, 2014, the amount of carryback to any taxable year shall not exceed 50 percent of the net operating loss.

(B) For a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2015, the amount of carryback to any taxable year shall not exceed 75 percent of the net operating loss.

(C) For a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1,
 2015, and before January 1, 2019, the amount of carryback to any taxable year shall not exceed 100 percent of the net operating loss.

(3) A net operating loss carryback shall not be carried back to any taxable year beginning before January 1, 2011.

(e) (1) (A) For a net operating loss for any taxable year
 beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before January 1, 2000, Section 172(b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply as it read on January 1, 2015, and is modified to substitute “five taxable years” in lieu of “20 years” except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4).

(B) For a net operating loss for any income year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2008, Section 172(b)(1)(A)(ii)(I) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to substitute “10 taxable years” in lieu of “20 taxable years.”

(C) Section 172(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(D) Section 172(b)(1)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(2) For any income year beginning before January 1, 2000, in the case of a “new business,” the “five taxable years” referred to in paragraph (1) shall be modified to read as follows:

(A) “Eight taxable years” for a net operating loss attributable to the first taxable year of that new business.

(B) “Seven taxable years” for a net operating loss attributable to the second taxable year of that new business.

(C) “Six taxable years” for a net operating loss attributable to the third taxable year of that new business.

(3) For any carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by Section
 24416.3, the carryover period specified in this subdivision shall be extended as follows:

(A) By one year for a net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning in 1991.

(B) By two years for a net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 1991.

(4) The net operating loss attributable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before January 1, 1994, shall be a net operating loss carryover to each of the 10 taxable years following the year of the loss if it is incurred by a corporation that was either of the following:

(A) Under the jurisdiction of the court in a Title 11 or similar case at any time
 prior to January 1, 1994. The loss carryover provided in the preceding sentence shall not apply to any loss incurred in an income year after the taxable year during which the corporation is no longer under the jurisdiction of the court in a Title 11 or similar case.

(B) In receipt of assets acquired in a transaction that qualifies as a tax-free reorganization under Section 368(a)(1)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Eligible small business” means any trade or business that has gross receipts, less returns and allowances, of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) during the income year.

(2) Except as provided in
 subdivision (g), “new business” means any trade or business activity that is first commenced in this state on or after January 1, 1994.

(3) “Title 11 or similar case” shall have the same meaning as in Section 368(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) In the case of any trade or business activity conducted by a partnership or an “S” corporation, paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be applied to the partnership or “S” corporation.

(g) For purposes of this section, in determining whether a trade or business activity qualifies as a new business under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), the following rules shall apply:

(1) In any case where a taxpayer purchases or otherwise
 acquires all or any portion of the assets of an existing trade or business (irrespective of the form of entity) that is doing business in this state (within the meaning of Section 23101), the trade or business thereafter conducted by the taxpayer (or any related person) shall not be treated as a new business if the aggregate fair market value of the acquired assets (including real, personal, tangible, and intangible property) used by the taxpayer (or any related person) in the conduct of its trade or business exceeds 20 percent of the aggregate fair market value of the total assets of the trade or business being conducted by the taxpayer (or any related person). For purposes of this paragraph only, the following rules shall apply:

(A) The determination of the relative fair market values of the acquired assets and the total assets shall be
 made as of the last day of the first taxable year in which the taxpayer (or any related person) first uses any of the acquired trade or business assets in its business activity.

(B) Any acquired assets that constituted property described in Section 1221(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code in the hands of the transferor shall not be treated as assets acquired from an existing trade or business, unless those assets also constitute property described in Section 1221(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code in the hands of the acquiring taxpayer (or related person).

(2) In any case where a taxpayer (or any related person) is engaged in one or more trade or business activities in this state, or has been engaged in one or more trade or business activities in this state within the preceding
 36 months (“prior trade or business activity”), and thereafter commences an additional trade or business activity in this state, the additional trade or business activity shall only be treated as a new business if the additional trade or business activity is classified under a different division of the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 edition, than are any of the taxpayer’s (or any related person’s) current or prior trade or business activities.

(3) In a case in which a taxpayer, including all related persons, is engaged in trade or business activities wholly outside of this state and the taxpayer first commences doing business in this state (within the meaning of Section 23101) after December 31, 1993 (other than by purchase or other acquisition described in
 paragraph (1)), the trade or business activity shall be treated as a new business under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(4) In a case in which the legal form under which a trade or business activity is being conducted is changed, the change in form shall be disregarded and the determination of whether the trade or business activity is a new business shall be made by treating the taxpayer as having purchased or otherwise acquired all or any portion of the assets of an existing trade or business under the rules of paragraph (1).

(5) “Related person” shall mean any person that is related to the taxpayer under either Section 267 or 318 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) “Acquire” shall include any transfer, whether or
 not for consideration.

(7) (A) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997, the term “new business” shall include any taxpayer that is engaged in biopharmaceutical activities or other biotechnology activities that are described in Codes 2833 to 2836, inclusive, of the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC) Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 edition, and as further amended, and that has not received regulatory approval for any product from the Food and Drug Administration.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph:

(i) “Biopharmaceutical activities” means those activities that use organisms or materials derived from organisms, and their
 cellular, subcellular, or molecular components, in order to provide pharmaceutical products for human or animal therapeutics and diagnostics. Biopharmaceutical activities make use of living organisms to make commercial products, as opposed to pharmaceutical activities that make use of chemical compounds to produce commercial products.

(ii) “Other biotechnology activities” means activities consisting of the application of recombinant DNA technology to produce commercial products, as well as activities regarding pharmaceutical delivery systems designed to provide a measure of control over the rate, duration, and site of pharmaceutical delivery.

(h) For purposes of corporations whose net income is determined under Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101), Section 25108
 applies to each of the following:

(1) The amount of net operating loss incurred in any taxable year that may be carried forward to another taxable year.

(2) The amount of any loss carry forward that may be deducted in any taxable year.

(i) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe appropriate regulations to carry out the purposes of this section, including any regulations necessary to prevent the avoidance of the purposes of this section through splitups, shell corporations, partnerships, tiered ownership structures, or otherwise.

(j) The Franchise Tax Board may reclassify any net operating loss carryover determined under either paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision
 (b) as a net operating loss carryover under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) upon a showing that the reclassification is necessary to prevent evasion of the purposes of this section.

(k) Except as otherwise provided, the amendments made by Chapter 107 of the Statutes of 2000 apply to net operating losses for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 36.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.1.

(a) A qualified taxpayer, as defined in Section 24416.4 or 24416.7, or Section 24416.2, 24416.5, or 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, may elect to take the deduction provided by Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the net operating loss deduction, as modified by Section 24416, in computing net income under Section 24341, with the following exceptions to Section 24416:

(1) Subdivision (a) of Section 24416, relating to years in which allowable losses are sustained, shall not be applicable.

(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 24416, relating to the 50-percent reduction of losses, shall not be
 applicable.

(3) The provisions of subparagraphs (B) and (C) of Section 172(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to years to which loss may be carried, shall not apply. To the extent applicable to California law, net operating losses attributable to entities with losses described by Section 172(b)(1)(J) shall be applied in accordance with Section 172(b)(1)(A) and (B) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Corporations whose income is subject to the provisions of Section 25101 or 25101.15 shall make the computations required
 by Section 25108.

(c) The election to compute the net operating loss under this section shall be made in a statement attached to the original return, timely filed for the year in which the net operating loss is incurred and shall be irrevocable. In addition to the exceptions specified in subdivision (a), Section 24416.4 or 24416.7, as appropriate, or Section 24416.2, 24416.5, or 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, as appropriate, shall be applicable.

(d) Any carryover of a net operating loss sustained by a qualified taxpayer, as defined in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 24416.2 as that section read immediately prior to January 1, 1997, shall, if previously elected, continue to be a deduction, as provided in subdivision (a), applied as if the
 provisions of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 24416.2, as that section read prior to January 1, 1997, still applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 37.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 24416, 24416.1, 24416.4, and 24416.7, or Sections 24416.2, 24416.5, and 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, and Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, no net operating loss deduction shall be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004.

(b) For any carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, shall be extended as follows:

(1) By one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2003.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 38.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.4.

(a) The term “qualified taxpayer” as used in Section 24416.1 includes a corporation engaged in the conduct of a trade or business within the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone designated pursuant to Section 7102 of the Government Code. For purposes of this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(1) A net operating loss shall not be a net operating loss carryback for any taxable year and, except as provided in subparagraph (B), a net operating loss for any taxable year beginning on or after the date the area in which the taxpayer conducts a trade or business is designated the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone shall be a net operating loss carryover to each following taxable
 year that ends before the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone expiration date or to each of the 15 taxable years following the taxable year of loss, if longer.

(2) In the case of a financial institution to which Section 585, 586, or 593 of the Internal Revenue Code applies, a net operating loss for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1984, shall be a net operating loss carryover to each of the five years following the taxable year of the loss. Subdivision (b) of Section 24416.1 shall not apply.

(3) “Net operating loss” means the loss determined under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, as modified by Section 24416.1, attributable to the taxpayer’s business activities within the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone (as
 defined in Section 7102 of the Government Code) prior to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone expiration date. The attributable loss shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11, modified as follows:

(A) The loss shall be apportioned to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone by multiplying the loss from the business by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is 2.

(B) “The Los Angeles Revitalization Zone” shall be substituted for “this state.”

(4) A net operating loss carryover shall be a deduction only with respect to the taxpayer’s business income attributable to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone (as
 defined in Section 7102 of the Government Code) determined in accordance with subdivision (c).

(5) If a loss carryover is allowable pursuant to this section for any taxable year after the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone designation has expired, the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone shall be deemed to remain in existence for purposes of computing the limitation set forth in paragraph (2) and allowing a net operating loss deduction.

(6) Attributable income shall be that portion of the taxpayer’s California source business income which is apportioned to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone. For that purpose, the taxpayer’s business income attributable to sources in this state first shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101). That business
 income shall be further apportioned to the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17, modified as follows:

(A) Business income shall be apportioned to the Los Angeles
 Revitalization Zone by multiplying total California business income of the taxpayer by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is 2.

(B) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone during the taxable year and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state during the taxable year.

(C) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid by the taxpayer in the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone during the taxable year for
 compensation, and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid by the taxpayer in this state during the taxable year.

(7) “Los Angeles Revitalization Zone expiration date” means the date the Los Angeles Revitalization Zone designation expires, is repealed, or becomes inoperative pursuant to Section 7102, 7103, or 7104 of the Government Code.

(b) This section shall be inoperative on the first day of the taxable year beginning on or after the determination date, and each taxable year thereafter, with respect to the taxpayer’s business activities within a geographic area that is excluded from the map pursuant to Section 7102 of the Government Code, or an excluded area determined pursuant to Section 7104 of the Government Code. The determination date is the earlier of the
 first effective date of a determination under subdivision (c) of Section 7102 of the Government Code occurring after December 1, 1994, or the first effective date of an exclusion of an area from the amended Los Angeles Revitalization Zone under Section 7104 of the Government Code. However, if the taxpayer has any unused loss amount as of the date this section becomes inoperative, that unused loss amount may continue to be carried forward as provided in this section.

(c) A taxpayer who qualifies as a “qualified taxpayer” under one or more sections shall, for the taxable year of the net operating loss and any taxable year to which that net operating loss may be carried, designate on the original return filed for each year the section that applies to that taxpayer with respect to that net operating loss. If the taxpayer is eligible to qualify
 under more than one section, the designation is to be made after taking into account subdivision (d).

(d) If a taxpayer is eligible to qualify under this section and either Section 24416.2, 24416.5, or 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, as a “qualified taxpayer,” with respect to a net operating loss in a taxable year, the taxpayer shall designate which section is to apply to the taxpayer.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 24416, the amount of the loss determined under this section or Section 24416.2, 24416.5, or 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, shall be the only net operating loss allowed to be carried over from that taxable year and the designation under subdivision (c) shall be included in the election under Section 24416.1.

(f) This section shall cease to be operative on December 1, 1998. However, any unused net operating loss may continue to be carried over to following years as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 39.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.   Section inoperative December 1, 1998, as prescribed in subd. (f).    Note: See also provisions for inoperation in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

24416.7.

(a) The term “qualified taxpayer” as used in Section 24416.1 includes a corporation that conducts a farming business that is directly affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors. For purposes of this subdivision, all of the following shall apply:

(1) A net operating loss shall not be a net operating loss carryback to any taxable year, and a net operating loss for any taxable year beginning on or after the date that the area in which the taxpayer conducts a farming business is affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors shall be a net operating loss carryover to each of the nine taxable years following the taxable year of loss, until used.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) “Net operating loss” means the loss determined under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, as modified by Section 24416.1, attributable to the taxpayer’s farming business activities affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors. That attributable loss shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11, modified for purposes of this subdivision, as follows:

(i) A loss shall be apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors by multiplying the total loss from the farming business by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is two.

(ii) “The area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors” shall be substituted for “this state.”

(B) A net operating loss carryover computed under this section shall be allowed as a deduction only with respect to the taxpayer’s farming business income attributable to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(C) Attributable income is that portion of the taxpayer’s California source farming business income that is apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors. For that purpose, that taxpayer’s farming business income attributable to sources in this state first shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101) of Part 11. That farming business
 income shall be further apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 of Part 11, modified for purposes of this subdivision as follows:

(i) Farming business income shall be apportioned to the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors by multiplying the total California farming business income of the taxpayer by a fraction, the numerator of which is the property factor plus the payroll factor, and the denominator of which is two. For purposes of this paragraph:

(I) The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value of the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors
 during the taxable year, and the denominator of which is the average value of all the taxpayer’s real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in this state during the taxable year.

(II) The payroll factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the total amount paid by the taxpayer in the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors during the taxable year for compensation, and the denominator of which is the total compensation paid by the taxpayer in this state during the taxable year.

(ii) If a loss carryover is allowable pursuant to this section for any taxable year after Pierce’s disease and its vectors occurred, the area affected by Pierce’s disease and its vectors shall be deemed to remain in existence for purposes of computing the limitation set
 forth in subparagraph (B) and allowing a net operating loss deduction.

(b) A taxpayer who qualifies as a “qualified taxpayer” under one or more sections shall, for the taxable year of the net operating loss and any taxable year to which that net operating loss may be carried, designate on the original return filed for each year the section that applies to that taxpayer with respect to that net operating loss. If the taxpayer is eligible to qualify under more than one section, the designation is to be made after taking into account subdivision (c).

(c) If a taxpayer is eligible to compute its net operating loss under this section and either Section 24416.4, or Section 24416.2, 24416.5, or 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, as a “qualified taxpayer,” with
 respect to a net operating loss in a taxable year, the taxpayer shall designate which section is to apply to the taxpayer.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 24416, the amount of the loss determined under this section, Section 24416.4, or Section 24416.2, 24416.5, or 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, shall be the only net operating loss allowed to be carried over from that taxable year and the designation under subdivision (b) shall be included in the election under Section 24416.1.

(e) (1) A qualified taxpayer may utilize the net operating loss carryover allowed by this section only if the Department of Food and Agriculture determines that Pierce’s disease and its vectors caused the net operating loss for which the qualified taxpayer seeks a
 deduction under this section.

(2) To make the determination required by this subdivision, the Department of Food and Agriculture shall utilize the definitions in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations, relating to Pierce’s disease and its vectors.

(3) The Department of Food and Agriculture may prescribe regulations necessary to implement this subdivision.

(f) This section applies to net operating losses attributable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2001, and before January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 40.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

24416.21.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 24416, 24416.1, 24416.4, and 24416.7, Sections 24416.2, 24416.5, and 24416.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, and Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, no net operating loss deduction shall be allowed for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2012.

(b) For any net operating loss or carryover of a net operating loss for which a deduction is denied by subdivision (a), the carryover period under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, shall be extended as follows:

(1) By one year, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2011.

(2) By two years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and before January 1, 2010.

(3) By three years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2009.

(4) By four years, for losses incurred in taxable years beginning before January 1, 2008.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a net operating loss deduction shall be allowed for carryback of a net operating loss attributable to a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2013, and before
 January 1, 2019.

(d) The disallowance of any net operating loss deduction for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2010, pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not apply to a taxpayer with income subject to tax under this part of less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the taxable year.

(e) (1) The disallowance of any net operating loss deduction for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2010, and before January 1, 2012, pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not apply to a taxpayer with preapportioned income of less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for the taxable year.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “preapportioned income” means
 net income after state adjustments, before the application of the apportionment and allocation provisions of this part.
